Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6332.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 81a. (1) An airport, airport authority, political subdivision, or any contractor, agent, or other person acting on behalf of an airport, airport authority, or political subdivision shall not directly or indirectly use ADS-B information, information derived from ADS-B data, Federal Aviation Administration surveillance data derived from ADS-B information, or any report, analysis, or record generated from such information for the purpose of calculating, assessing, billing, invoicing, imposing, or collecting a landing fee, touch-and-go fee, departure fee, or any other fee or charge based on the operation of an aircraft. (2) Subsection (1) applies regardless of whether the information originates from an ADS-B in or ADS-B out system. (3) Any fee or charge assessed, imposed, billed, invoiced, or collected in violation of this section is void and unenforceable. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Aircraft" means an aircraft that has a gross weight of less than 12,500 pounds and operates under 14 CFR part 91. (b) "Automatic dependent surveillance-broadcast" or "ADS-B" means an advanced aviation surveillance technology that combines an aircraft's positioning source, the aircraft's avionics, and a ground infrastructure to create an accurate surveillance interface between an aircraft and air traffic control. Automatic dependent surveillance-broadcast or ADS-B includes both ADS-B in and ADS-B out systems, which can provide information, such as an aircraft's global positioning system location, altitude, ground speed, and other data, to ground stations and other aircraft, as well as weather and traffic information to aircraft operators. (c) "Touch-and-go landing" means an operation by an aircraft that lands and departs on a runway without stopping or exiting the runway.